Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 124 Election Offenses and Prosecutions [Repealed]

124.010.
Clerk
making or permitting wrongful registration, or failing to deliver copies of
registration records. [Repealed.]

124.020.
Clerk
making or permitting wrongful registration, or failing to deliver copies of
registration records. [Repealed.]

124.030.
Alteration,
suppression, mutilation or destruction of registration record; making or use
of false or fraudulent record. [Repealed.]

124.040.
Interfering
with registration. [Repealed.]

124.050.
Alteration
or suppression of nomination papers. [Repealed.]

124.060.
Forgery
of nomination papers. [Repealed.]

124.070.
Clerk
failing to place candidate’s name on ballot. [Repealed.]

124.080.
Clerk
not using proper paper for ballots. [Repealed.]

124.090.
Printer
violating duty in printing ballots. [Repealed.]

124.100.
Removal
or destruction of election booths or supplies. [Repealed.]

124.110.
Sheriff
failing to hold election or perform other duty concerning election. [Repealed.]

124.120.
Election
officer failing to perform duty. [Repealed.]

124.130.
Election
officer refusing to admit challenger. [Repealed.]

124.140.
Preventing
voter from casting ballot; interfering with election. [Repealed.]

124.150.
False
personation of voter; nonresident or unqualified person voting; repeating.
[Repealed.]

124.160.
Election
officer receiving illegal vote or rejecting legal vote. [Repealed.]

124.170.
Disobeying
election officer’s command. [Repealed.]

124.180.
Removing
or tampering with ballots. [Repealed.]

124.190.
Bribery.
[Repealed.]

124.200.
Providing
another with intoxicants on election day. [Repealed.]

124.220.
Fabricating,
altering, suppressing or destroying stub book, return or certificate of election.
[Repealed.]

124.230.
Member
of board of election commissioners violating law or failing to perform duties.
[Repealed.]

124.240.
Intimidating
election officer or board of election commissioners. [Repealed.]

124.250.
Violations
of duties for which no other penalty is provided. [Repealed.]

124.260.
Advising
or assisting violation of election laws. [Repealed.]

124.270.
Irregularity
in convening or conducting election no defense. [Repealed.]

124.280.
Penalties
applicable to regular elections apply to primaries and to elections for United
States Senator. [Repealed.]

124.290.
Election
officers to report violations; may arrest offenders. [Repealed.]

124.300.
Grand
jury may compel testimony as to violations of election laws. [Repealed.]

124.310.
Grand
jury may compel production of evidence relating to corrupt practices. [Repealed.]

124.320.
Evidence
required to support conviction for violating election laws. [Repealed.]

124.330.
Witnesses
not exempted from giving self-criminating testimony; immunity. [Repealed.]

124.340.
Limitation
of prosecutions. [Repealed.]